Idaho, session 2026, H0920.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Board of Education and the Board
of Regents of the University of Idaho for Health Education Programs, the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL BENEFIT
COSTS PAYMENTS TOTAL
Eastern Idaho Med Residencies $240,000 $240,000
Family Medicine Residencies $60,000 420,000 480,000
UniversityofUtahMedicalEduction 0 180,000 180,000
GRAND TOTAL $60,000 $840,000 $900,000
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the State Board of Education and the Board of Regents of the University of
Idaho for Health Education Programs is hereby increased by two and one-half
(2.50) for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION PROGRAM -- FUNDING FOR NEW GRAD-
UATE MEDICAL EDUCATION RESIDENCIES AND FELLOWSHIPS. (1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, it is the intent of the Legislature
to fund 15.00 new graduate medical education residencies and fellowships re-
quested for fiscal year 2027 from the Rural Health Transformation Program.
(a) When such moneys become available, the moneys for 15.00 new gradu-
ate medical education residencies and fellowships requested for fiscal
year 2027 shall be expended from the Rural Health Transformation Fund.


(b) Subject to legislative oversight, the State Board of Education
shall calculate, using the time of the award and the appropriation
amount, any amounts that should be transferred from the Rural Health
Transformation Fund to the General Fund to reimburse costs incurred
for graduate medical education residencies in fiscal year 2027. The
executive director of the State Board of Education shall include a sup-
plemental request to transfer as part of the fiscal year 2028 budget
submission for affected programs. If Rural Health Transformation Pro-
gram funds become available before July 1, 2026, no transfer from the
General Fund would occur.
(c) Subject to legislative oversight, any General Fund moneys ini-
tially appropriated to the Health Education Programs for graduate
medical education residencies and fellowships in fiscal year 2027 but
no longer utilized for that purpose due to the availability of funding
from the Rural Health Transformation Fund shall then be used for new
undergraduate medical education seats in compliance with Chapter 257,
Laws of 2025.
(d) It is not the intent of the Legislature to create an unsustainable
funding structure beyond the term of the Rural Health Transformation
Program.
(2) The Department of Health and Welfare and the Office of the State
Board of Education shall provide a report of compliance with this section to
the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee no later than December 1, 2026.
Methodology, content, and format of the report shall be determined in con-
sultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.